dictsource/ur_rules
.group خ
	خ	xV
	خ (L01	x
	@) خ (ت	x
	خّ	x:V
	خّ(L01	x:
	_) خوش	x'US
	_)خود	x'Ud
	_) خواہش	xv'a:HIS
	_) خیا	x'aja:
	_)خوا	xva:
	_)خدا	xUda:
	_)خوب	xu:b
	خبردار	xabaRda:R
	خْ	x
	_)خداوند	xUda:vand
	_)خصلت	xas.lat
	_)خض(ر	xIz
	_)خمار	xUma:R
	_)خورد	xURd
	_)خردبین	xURdi:n
	_)خروج	xURu:J
	_)خوشبو	xUSbu:
	_)خوشنود	xUSnu:d
	_)خلوت	xIlvat
	_)خلافت	xIla:fat
	خوشگوار	xUSgava:R
	_)خسرو	xUsRo:


.group د
	د	dV
	دھ	d#V
	د (L01	d
	دھ (L01	d#
	دّ	d:V
	دّ(L01	d:
	درخواست	d,aRxv'a:st
	دیا(_	d'i:;a:
	درج	d'aRJ
	دیوا	d'i:va:
	دفاع	d'Ifa:
	_) دہ (L02	d'EH
	_)دنیا	dUn'i:;a:
	دہشت	d'EHS'at
	دلچسپ	d,Ilc'asp
	دھیم	d#'i:m
	_) دوسر	d'u:sR
	_) دین	de:n
	_) دیت	de:t
	دہ(_	da
	_)دشمن	dUSman
	_)دلکش	dIlkaS
	دریافت	daRja:ft
	_)دعا	dUa:
	_)دودھ	du:d#
	دْ	d
	_)دشوار	dUSva:R
	_)درخشند	daRaxSInd
	_)درست	dURUst
	_)درگزر	daRgUzaR
	_)درند	daRInd
	_)دلوا	dIlva:
	_)دکان	dUka:n
	_)دید	di:d
	_)دستر	dastaR
	_)دقت	dIq:at
	_)دوات	dava:t
	_)دہر(L03	dOHR
	_)دلاس	dIla:s
	دانست	da:nIst
	دستاویز	dasta:ve:z
	_)دبل(L01	dUbl
	_)دختر	dUxtaR
	_)درانداز	daRanda:z

.group ڈ
	ڈ	d.V
	ڈھ	d.#V
	ڈ (L01	d.
	ڈھ (L01	d.#
	ڈّ	d.:V
	ڈّ(L01	d.:
	ڈھونڈ	d.#'u:nd.
	@) ڈز (_	d.z
	ڈرائیور	d.R'a:jvaR
	ڈْ	d.
	_)ڈبو	d.Ub'o:
	_)ڈبڈبا	d.Ubd.Uba:
	_)ڈاکٹر	d.a:kt.aR
	L03)ڈنگ	d.Ing
	_)ڈوب	d.u:b
	_)ڈھٹا	d.#It.a:
	_)ڈائرک(ٹ	d.a:IRIk
	_)ڈگری	d.IgRi:
	_)ڈگمگ	d.agmag
	_)ڈگڈگ	d.Ugd.Ug
	_)ڈلیور	d.Ili:vaR
	_)ڈکشنری	d.IkSnaRi:
	_)ڈکٹی(L02	d.Ikt.e:
	_)ڈکیت	d.ake:t
	_)ڈھیل	d.#i:l
	_)ڈیوٹی	d.ju:t.i:
	_)ڈسٹ(ر	d.Ist.
	_)ڈسٹل	d.Ist.Il
	_)ڈش	d.IS
	_)ڈسک	d.Isk

.group ذ
	ذ	zV
	ذ (L01	z
	_) ذہ (L02	z'EH
	ذْ	z
	_)ذوال(L03L03P4	zUl
	_)ذلت	zIl:at

.group ر
	ر	RV
	ر (L01	R
	رّ	R:V
	رّ (l01	R:
	@) ر (ٹ	R
	@) ر (ڈ	R
	@) ردہ (_	Rd,a
	@) ر (چ	R
	_) رہ (L02	R'EH
	_) رخ	R'Ux
	_) رکن	R'Ukn
	@) ر (د	R
	_)رفت	Raft
	_)روی(L03	Ravai
	_)رشوت	RISvat
	رْ	R
	L03L03)ر(ز_	R
	_)رلا	RUla:
	_)روح	Ru:H
	_)رواج	RIva:J
	_)رجوع	RUJu:
	_)رفعت	RIfat
	_)رتب	RUtb
	_)رزق	RIzq
	_)رخن(L03	Raxn
	L03L03L03)رنگ(_	RIng
	_)رکاوٹ	RUka:vat.
	_)رپبل(ک	RIpablI
	_)رپور	RIpo:R
	_)رعایت	RIa:jat
	_)ریڈر	R'i:d.aR
	رزسٹر	RizIst.aR
	_)رزم	Razm
	_)رسال	RIs'a:l
	_)رسوا	RUsva:
	_)رسک	RIsk
	_)رشت	RISt
	_)رشد	RUSd
	_)رعونت	Rau:nat
	_)رفقا	RUfaq'a:
	_)روای(L02	RIv'a:ja
	_)رسول	Rasu:l
	_)ربط	Rabt
	_)رپہل	RUpEHl
	_)رجسٹر	RIJIst.aR
	_)رجسٹر(L01	RIJIst.R
	_)رجعت	RUJat
	_)رضوان	RIzva:n
	_)رعئت	RIa:It
	_)رغبت	RaQbat
	رفریجریٹر	RIfRi:JRe:t.aR
	رفوگر	Rafu:gaR

.group ڑ
	ڑ	r.V
	ڑ (L01	r.
	ڑّ	r.r.V
	ڑّ (L01	r.r.
	ڑھ	r.hV
	ڑھ (L01	r.h
	ڑْ	r.

.group ز
	ز	zV
	ز (L01	z
	زّ	z:V
	زّ (L01	z:
	_) زند	z'Ind
	_) زہ (L02	z'EH
	_) زلزل	z,alz'al
	زْ	z
	_)زلف	zUlf
	_)زبید	zUbe:d
	_)زحمت	zEHmat
	_)زعم	zO:m

.group ژ
	ژ	ZV
	ژ (L01	Z
	ژْ	Z

.group س
	س	sV
	س (L01	s
	سّ	ssV
	سّ (L01	ss
	_) سرخ	s'URx
	_)سن(L01_	s'Un
	_) سلجھ	sUl'aJh
	_) سلجھ (L01	sUlJh
	_) سدھر	sUdh'aR
	_) سدھر (L01	sUdhR
	_) سلسل	s'Ils,Il
	_) ستار	sIt'a:R
	@) س (ٹ	s
	سندھ	s'Ind#
	سیکھ	s'i:k#
	@)ست(_	st
	_) سپرد	sUp'URd
	_) سہ (L02	s'EH
	سیدھ	s'i:d#
	سیاست	sja:s'at
	سرگرم	s,aRg'aRm
	L03L02)ستان(_S4	Ista:n
	L03L02)ستانی(_S5	Ist'a:ni
	_)س(ٹL01L03	s
	سْ	s
	L03L03L02)سٹ(_S2	Ist.
	_)سرحد	saRHad
	_)سربراہ	saRbaRa:H
	_)سانح	sa:nIH
	_)سبک	sUbUk
	_)سفید	safe:d
	_)سگریٹ	sIgRe:t.
	_)سپاہ	sIpa:H
	_)سہولت	saHu:lat
	سیرت	si:Rat
	_)سسک(L01	sIsk
	_)سلائ(L02	sla:I
	_)سلطان	sUlta:n
	L03L03)سنگ(_	sIng
	_)سکرین	skRi:n
	_)سکڑ(L01	sUkr.
	_)سمت	sImt
	_)سمٹ(L01	sImt.
	_)سنتر(L01	santR
	_)سندر	sUndaR
	_)سیڑھ	si:r.h
	_)سنٹر	sInt.aR
	_)سنہر	sUnEHR
	_)سرجن	saRJan
	_)سرمد	saRmad
	_)سرنگ	sURang
	_)سرونٹ	saRvant.
	_)سرود	sURu:d
	_)سرکش	saRkaS
	_)سریل	sURi:l
	_)سرفروش	saRfaRo:S
	_)سرگرد	saRgaRd
	_)سرکنڈ	saRkand.
	_)سرشت	saRISt
	_)سعادت	s'a:dat
	_)سفارت	sIf'a:Rat
	_)سکونت	sUku:nat
	_)سکیڑ	sUke:r.
	_)سہان	sUHa:n
	_)سہیل(L01	saHe:l
	_)سیئ	si:
	_)سیا(ح	saia:
	_)سیپ(L01	si:p
	_)سیخ	si:x
	_)سانور(L03	sa~:vR
	_)سانول(L03	sa~:vl
	_)سویر	save:R
	_)سویلا	sIvi:la:
	_)سوی(ٹ	svi:
	_)سٹپٹ	sat.pat.
	_)سرپرست	saRpaRast
	_)سرسر	saRsaR
	_)سرفراز	saRfaRa:z
	_)سرنشین	saRnaSi:n
	_)سرہنگ	saRHang
	_)سطر	satR
	_)سپر(وا	sUpaR
	_)سپنج	spanJ
	_)سپوت	sapu:t
	_)سپہدار	sIpEHda:R
	_)سپیکر	spi:kaR
	_)سپیر(L01	sape:R

.group ش
	ش	SV
	ش (L01	S
	شّ	SSV
	شّ (L01	SS
	_) شعب	S'Ob
	شاعر	Sa:'a:IR
	_) شعرا	S'ORa:
	_) شعل	S'Ol
	@)ش(ت	S
	_) شخص	S'axs.
	_) شہ (L02	S'EH
	شرمند	S,aRm'Ind
	_)شمار	SUma:R
	L03)شنز(_	Sanz
	شعور	Sau:R
	_)ششدر	SaSdaR
	شْ	S
	_)شیرین	Si:Ri:n
	_)شبنم	Sabnam
	_)شیش	Si:S
	شکست	Sikast
	_)شربت	SaRbat
	_)شکران	SUkRa:n
	_)شکنج	SIkanJ
	_)شگاف	SIga:f
	_)شکر(_گزار	SUkr
	_)شفٹ	SIft.
	_)شاستر	Sa:stR
	_)شاگرد	Sa:gIRd
	_)شعاع	SUa:
	شگفت	SagUft
	_)شگوف	Sagu:f
	شگون	Sagu:n
	شمارند	SUm'a:Rand
	_)شعار	SIa:R
	_)شکن(L01	SIkn
	شنوا	SUnva:

.group ص
	ص	s.V
	ص (L01	s.
	صّ	s.:V
	صّ (L01	s.:
	صوب	s.'u:b
	_)صنف	s.Inf
	_)صفت	s.Ifat
	صْ	s.
	_)صاحب	s.a:HIb
	_)صنعت	s.anat
	صورت	s.u:Rat

.group ض
	ض	zV
	ض (L01	z
	ضّ	z:v
	ضّ (L01	z:
	ضرور	zaRu:R
	ضْ	z

.group ط
	ط	tV
	طھ	t#V
		ط (L01	t
	طھ (L01	t#
	طّ	t:V
	طّ (L01	t:
	طْ	t
	_)طوف(ا	tu:f
	_)طول	tu:l
	_)طیار	tai;a:R
	_)طلسم	tIlIsm
	_)طفل	tIfl

.group ظ
	ظ	z.V
	ظ (L01	z.
	ظّ	z.:V
	ظّ (L01	z.:
	ظْ	z.
	_)ظہر(L03	z.UHR

.group غ
	غ	QV
	غ (L01	Q
	غّ	Q:V
	غّ (L01	Q:
	غْ	Q
	_)غذا	QIza:
	_)غبار	QUba:R
	_)غفلت	Qaflat
	_)غرور	QURu:R
	_)غلام	QUla:m

.group ف
	ف	fV
	ف (L01	f
	فّ	ffV
	فّ (L01	ff
	_) فکر	f'IkR
	_) فہ (L02	f'EH
	فلم	f'Ilm
	_)فریب	faRe:b
	فْ	f
	_)فلسف	falsaf
	_)فقر(L03	fIqR
	_)فیاض	fai;a:z
	_)فلی(L02	fle:
	_)فٹ(_نوٹ	fUt.
	_)فراست	faRa:sat
	_)فراڈ	fRa:d.
	فطرت	fItRat
	_)فطر	fITR
	_)ففٹی	fIft.i:
	_)فگار	fIga:R
	_)فرشت	faRISt
	_)فشا	fISa:
	_)فنک(شن	fank
	_)فلٹر	fIlt.aR
	_)فرعون	fIRaUn
	_)فرہنگ	faRHang
	_)فرفر	faRfaR
	_)فیت	fi:t
	_)فریفت	faRe:ft
	_)فروع	faRo:
	_)فریبند	faRe:band
	_)فرحت	faRHat
	_)فرخند	faRxand
	_)فرزند	faRzand

.group ق
	ق	qV
	ق (L01	q
	قّ	q:V
	قّ (L01	q:
	قاعد	q'a:jd
	_) قسط	q'Ist
	_) قیا	q'aja:
	_)قصور	qUs.u:R
	قْ	q
	_)قبل(L03	qIbl
	_)قانون	q'a:nu:n
	قسمت	qIsmat
	_)قدوس	qUdu:s
	_)قریش	qURe:S
	_)قدرت	qUdRat

.group ک
	ک	kV
	کھ	k#V
	ک (L01	k
	کھ (L01	k#
	کّ	kkV
	کّ (L01	kk
	_) کتن	k'Itn
	کتاب	kIt'a:b
	کوشش	k'o:SIS
	_) کہ (L02	k'EH
	کارکن	k'a:Rk,Un
	_)کردار	kIRda:R
	_)کہن(L01	kEHn
	_)کہت(L01	kEHt
	_)کمزور	kamzo:R
	_)کرسک	kaRsak
	_)کھج	k#UJ
	_)کھجور	k#aJu:R
	_)کھچ	k#Ic
	_)کھد(L01	k#Ud
	کْ	k
	_)کیڑ	ki:r.
	_)کرسی	kUrsi:
	_)کرشم(L03	kaRISm
	_)کارروا	ka:RRava:
	L03)کنگ(_	kIng
	_)کلینڈر	kalend.aR
	_)کھلا(ڑ	k#Ila:
	_)کنگل	kangl
	_)کن(ٹ	kan
	_)کنٹر(L03	kant.R
	_)کنڈک	kandak
	_)کنکر	kankaR
	_)کوا(ل	kUa:
	_)کواڑ	kIva:r.
	L03L03)کٹر	kt.aR
	_)کوز(L03	ku:z
	_)کٹکٹ	kat.kat.
	_)کھدیڑ	k#ade:r.
	_)کھسک(L01	k#Isk
	_)کھلبل	k#albal
	_)کھونٹ	k#u:nt.
	_)کھڑکی	k#Ir.ki:
	_)کھیر	k#i:R
	_)کہر	kOHR
	_)کیمیا	ki:mia:
	_)کلی(ن	kli:
	_)کروٹ	kaRvat.
	_)کفر	kUfR
	_)کرچی	kIRci:
	_)کچیل	kUce:l
	_)کرید	kURe:d
	_)کریل	kaRe:l
	_)کریڈٹ	kRe:d.It.
	کشائی	kUSa:i:
	_)کشاد	kUSa:d
	_)کشور	kISvaR
	_)کلیج	kale:J
	کارکرد	ka:RkaRd
	_)کنند	kUnand
	_)کلاس	kla:s
	_)کلبل	kalbal
	_)کلو(م	kIlo:
	_)کلکار	kIlka:R
	_)کلک(L02L01	kalak
	_)کلکٹر	kalIkt.aR
	_)کلہاڑ	kUlha:r.
	_)کلوٹ	kalu:t.
	_)کمار	kUma:R

.group گ
	گ	gV
	گھ	g#V
	گ (L01	g
	گھ (L01	g#
	گّ	g:V
	گّ (L01	g:
	_) گرفت	g'IRIft
	_) گزر	gUz'aR
	_) گزر (L01	gUzR
	گئے	g'ae:
	گئی	g'ai:
	گمشد	g'UmS,Ud
	_)گھما	g#'Uma:
	_) گہ (L02	g'EH
	گزارش	gUz'a:RIS
	_) گیت	g'i:t
	_)گزار	gUza:R
	_)گورنر	gavaRnaR
	_)گورنمنٹ	gavaRnmant.
	_)گروپ	gRu:p
	_)گفت	gUft
	_)گریڈ	gRe:d.
	گْ	g
	_)گناہ	gUna:H
	_)گروہ	gIRo:H
	_)گھل	g#Ul
	_)گذا	gUza:
	_)گذشت	gUzaSt
	_)گل(L04L03	gUl
	_)گرت(L01	gIRt
	_)گرن(L01_	gIRn
	_)گونگ(L01	gu:ng
	_)گیل(L01	gi:l
	_)گما	gUma:
	گداز	gUda:z
	_)گلاب	gUla:b
	_)گلاس	gla:s
	_)گلال	gUla:l
	_)گلستان	gUlIsta:n
	_)گتھ	gUt#
	_)گریز	gURe:z
	_)گچھ	gUc#
	_)گجرات	gUJRa:t
	_)گدگدا	gUdgUda:

.group ل
	ل	lV
	ل (L01	l
	لّ	l:V
	لّ (L01	l:
	لکھ	l'Ik#
	_) لہ (L02	l'EH
	_) لیت	le:t
	_) لین	le:n
	@)ل(ڈ	l
	لْ	l
	_)لاحق	la:HIq
	_)لیڈر	li:d.aR
	_)لفٹ	lIft.
	L03L03L03)لنگ	lIng
	_)لپیٹ	lape:t.
	L03L01)لٹ(_	lt.
	_)لسان	lIsa:n
	_)لشکر	laSkaR
	_)لیکچر	le:kcaR

.group م
	م	mV
	م (L01	m
	مّ	m:V
	مّ (L01	m:
	_) مشکل	m'USk,Il
	محکم	me:He:km
	مظاہر	mUz.'a:HIR
	_) ملن (L01	m'Iln
	مسجد	m'asJ,Id
	مشرق	m'aSR,Iq
	مقدم	mUq'adm
	مسلم	m'Usl,Im
	مسلما	mUs'alm,a:
	@) م (پ	m
	منزل	m'anz,Il
	@) م (ب	m
	محقق	mUH'aqIq
	منظر	m,anz.'aR
	محفل	m'EHf,Il
	مسکرا	m'Usk,URa:
	مسکراہٹ	m,Usk,URa:H'at.
	محسن	m'o:Hs,In
	مجرم	m'UJR,Im
	منظور	m,anz.'u:R
	ملزم	m'Ulz,Im
	مغرب	m'aQR,Ib
	متحد	mUt'aHId
	_) مہ (L02	m'EH
	مخالف	mUx'a:lIf
	مخالفت	m,Uxa:lIf'at
	ممکن	m'Umk,In
	مطالب	mUt'a:lIb
	موجود	mo:J'u:d
	متصل	mUt'as.Il
	مخبر	m'Uxb,IR
	ملحق	m'UlH,Iq
	مذہب	mazHab
	مقابل	mUqa:bIl
	_)مقتدر	mUqtadIR
	_)مقت(L02L06	mUqta
	_)مقدار	mIqda:R
	_)مقدر	mUqad:aR
	_)مقرب	mUqaR:Ib
	_)مصور	mUs.av:IR
	_)محرک	mUHaRIk
	_)محنت	mEHnat
	_)محور	mEHvaR
	_)منت(L02L02	mUnta
	_)منصب	mans.ab
	منصف	mUns.If
	_)منطق	mantIq
	_)مثال	mIsa:l
	_)مرغ	mURQ
	_)مایوس	m'a:ju:s
	_)مرت(L02L03	mURta
	_)مبتلا	mUbtIla:
	_)مقبر	maqbaR
	_)ملاز(م	mUla:zI
	_)مذاکر	mUza:kIR
	_)مجلس	maJlIs
	_)مست(L02L03	mUsta
	_)مطلق	mUtlaq
	_)معاو(L02	mUa:vI
	_)معاہد	mUa:HId
	_)مح(L02L01	mEH
	_)میٹھ	mi:t.#
	_)مت(L02L03	mUta
	مْ	m
	_)مراد	mURa:d
	_)مفتی	mUfti:
	_)مصنف	mUs.an:If
	_)مغلظ	mUQal:Iz.
	_)متعارف	mUta:RIf
	_)منحرف	mUnHaRIf
	_)منشی	mUnSi:
	_)معت(L02L03	mOta
	_)معجز	mOJIz
	_)مجموع	maJmu:
	_)معترض	mOtaRIz
	_)معتمد	mOtamId
	_)مشیر	mUSi:R
	مختار	mUxta:R
	_)مدہوش	madHo:S
	_)مرزا	mIRza:
	_)مزاج	mIza:J
	_)مسکین	mIski:n
	_)مشابہت	mUSa:bIHat
	_)مشاہد	mUSa:HId
	_)مشت	mUSt
	_)مشت(L02L03	mUsta
	_)محبت	mUHab:at
	_)محتا	mOHta:
	_)محت(L02L03	mOHta
	_)میرا(ث	mi:Ra:
	_)مفلس	mUflIs
	_)مفکر	mUfak:IR
	_)مستع(L02L03	mUsta:
	_)مدت	mUd:at
	_)متع(L02L03	mUta:
	مشقت	mUSaq:at
	مہذب	mUHaz:ab
	ملاقات	mUla:qa:t
	_)ملت(L02L03	mUlta
	_)مصط(L02L03	mUs.ta
	_)مدبر	mUdab:IR
	_)محاف(ظ	mUHa:fI
	_)مخا(L02L02	mUxa:
	_)مسند	masnad
	_)مسود	mUsav:Id
	_)مسوڑ	masu:r.
	_)مسکان	mUska:n
	_)مشار(L02	mUSa:RI
	_)مشاع(L02	mUSa:I
	_)مشفق	mUSfIq
	_)ملوا	mIlva:
	_)معظم	mUaz.am
	_)مضطرب	mUztaRIb
	_)مطالع(L03	mUta:l
	_)مسافر	mUsa:fIR
	_)مساوات	masa:va:t
	_)مسخر(L03	masxaR
	_)متوکل	mUtavak:Il
	_)متکلم	mUtakal:Im
	_)مخلص	mUxlIs.
	_)مظہر	maz.HaR
	_)معاند	mUa:nId
	_)مجوز	mUJav:Iz
	_)ممی(ر	mame:
	_)مدیر	mUdi:R
	_)مترجم	mUtaRaJ:Im
	_)متشدد	mUtaSad:Id
	_)متفکر	mUtafak:IR
	_)مروت	mURav:at
	_)معزز	mUaz:Iz
	_)معذرت	ma:zRat
	_)معرف	ma:RIf
	_)معرفت	ma:RIfat
	_)موند	mu:nd
	_)مونس	mu:nIs
	_)مونگ	mu:ng
	_)منمن	mInmIn
	_)منڈ(وا	mUnd.
	_)منڈیر	mUnd.e:R
	_)منکر	mUnkIR
	ملائ(م	mUla:I
	_)مخمل	maxmal
	_)مرچ(ی	mIRc
	_)مہربان	mEHERba:n
	_)مہلت	mOHlat
	_)میزان	mi:za:ni:
	_)میع	mi:
	_)میق	mi:q
	_)میلاد	mi:la:d
	_)مینا	mi:na:
	_)معین	mUai:an
	_)مفاہ(م	mUfa:HI
	_)مصالحت	mUs.a:lIHat
	_)مومن	mo:mIn
	_)مونچھ	mu:nc#
	_)مجسم(L03	mUJasm
	_)مجسٹریٹ	maJIst.Re:t.
	_)موکل	mUak:Il
	_)مرحل	maRHal
	_)میٹرک	me:t.RIk
	_)مماثلت	mUma:xIlat
	_)مخت(L02L03	mUxta
	مخفف	mUxaf:af
	متغیر	mUtQaiaR
	_)ممیز	mUmaiaz
	_)مرید	mURi:d
	_)موروث	mo:Ru:s
	_)مڑ(وا	mUr.
	_)مقیم	mUqi:m
	_)مودب	mUad:ab
	_)موخر	mUax:aR
	_)مورخ	mUaR:Ix
	ملاحظ	mUl'a:HIz.
	_)مقید	mUqai:ad
	_)مکرم	mUkaR:am
	_)متصل	mUtas.Il
	_)مبالغ	mUba:lIQ
	_)مرغول	maRQu:l
	مولود	mO:lu:d
	_)معم(L01	mUam:
	_)معمار	mEma:R
	_)معمر	mUamaR
	_)معلم	mUalIm
	_)معلق	mUalaq
	_)معمو	ma:mu:

.group ن
	ن	nV
	ن (L01	n
	@) نگ(_	ng
	@) ن (د	n
	@) ن (ب	n
	@) ن (س	n
	نّ	n:V
	نّ (L01	n:
	_) نکل	nIk'al
	_) نکل (L01	nIkl
	@) ن (چ	n
	_) نکال	nIk'a:l
	_)نگاہ	nIg'a:H
	_)نگا(L02	nIga:
	_) نمٹ	nIm'at.
	_) نمٹ (L01	nImt.
	@) ن (پ	n
	_)نچل	nIcl
	نشان	nIS'a:n
	@) ن (ڈ	n
	_) نظر	naz.'aR
	_) نظام	nIz.'a:m
	_) نہ (L02	nEHE
	L01) ن(ٹ	n
	نھ	nH
	_) نکت	n'Ukt
	_) نوا	n'ava:
	_) نما	n'Uma:
	_) نماز	nam'a:z
	L03L03) نا (_S2	na:
	L03L03) نی (_S2	ni:
	L03L03)نے(_S2	ne:
	_)نیند	ni:nd
	_)نقط	nUqt
	_)نقص	nUqs.
	@)نٹ(_	nt.
	@)ن(ج	n
	نْ	n
	_)نثار	nIsa:R
	_)نکاح	nIka:H
	_)نکاس	nIka:s
	_)نوشت	navISt
	_)نیچ(L01	ni:c
	_)نکھر(L01	nIk#R
	_)ناگہ(ا	na:gaH
	_)نبھ	nIb#
	_)نعمت	ne:mat
	L03L02)ننگ	nIng
	_)نرسر	naRsaR
	_)نسخ(L03	nUsx
	L03)ننگ(_	nIng
	_)ناشکر	na:SUkR
	_)نچوڑ	nIco:r.
	_)ندا(ئ	nIda:
	_)نگہ(د	nIgEH
	_)نخل	naxl
	_)نورد	navaRd
	_)نصاب	nIs.a:b
	نگہبان	nIgEHba:n
	نادہند	na:daHInd
	_)نارسید	na:Rasi:d
	_)نہاد	nIHa:d
	_)نشست	naSIst
	_)نشیب	naSe:b
	_)نازیب	na:ze:b
	_)نشاط	nISa:t
	_)نغم	naQm
	نحوست	naHu:sat
	_)نرخر	naRxaR

.group ں
	ں	n    // this should nasalize the vowel

.group ء
	ء	

.group ئ
	ئ	
	L01) ئ (L02	'I
	L01)ئ(ر	'a
